Hawaii statutes.
INDICTMENT
AND INFORMATION,

AVERMENTS,
DEFECTS

§806-26 Meaning of words and phrases.
The words and phrases used in an indictment shall be construed according to
their usual acceptation, except words and phrases which have been defined by
law or which have acquired a legal signification, which words and phrases shall
be construed according to their legal signification and shall be sufficient to
convey that meaning. [L 1915, c 215, pt of §2; RL 1925, §4041; RL 1935, §5500;
RL 1945, §10802; RL 1955, §258-12; HRS §711-26; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Cited: 37 H. 625, 643 (1947), questioned 82 F. Supp. 65, 104
(1948).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next